Utah statutes.
58-75-501.   Unlawful conduct.

"Unlawful conduct" includes, in addition to the definition in Section 58-1-501, using the title "genetic counselor" or any other title or designation tending to indicate that the person is a genetic counselor unless that person has a current license as a genetic counselor issued under this chapter.

